Maryland, session 2025, HB0554.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0554*

HOUSE BILL 554
That Section(s) 8–803 of Article – Labor and Employment of the Annotated Code of
Maryland be repealed.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Labor and Employment
8–607.
(b) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, the taxable wage base is the
[first $8,500 in wages] AMOUNT SET UNDER SUBSECTION (C)(3) OF THIS SECTION that:
(i) an employing unit pays to each employee for covered employment
during a calendar year;
(ii) an employing unit pays to each employee for covered employment
in this State and another state during a calendar year if the employee was continuously
employed immediately before and after a transfer of a business from another state during
a calendar year;
(iii) a reorganized employer pays to each employee for covered
employment if the employee was continuously employed immediately before and after the
reorganization in a calendar year and if the contribution rate of the reorganized employer
is based on the experience with payrolls and benefit charges of the employing unit before
the reorganization in accordance with § 8–613(b) of this subtitle; or
(iv) an employing unit or predecessor employer or combination of
both pays to each employee for covered employment during a calendar year if the payrolls
and benefit charges of the predecessor employing unit are transferred to the successor
employing unit in accordance with § 8–613(d) or (e) of this subtitle.
(2) If the Federal Unemployment Tax Act or any other federal tax law that
allows a credit for a contribution to a state unemployment insurance fund increases the
maximum amount of wages taxable under that law in a calendar year to AN AMOUNT THAT
IS more than [$8,500] THE PERCENTAGE OF THE AVERAGE ANNUAL WAGE FOR
EMPLOYEES IN THE STATE SET UNDER SUBSECTION (C)(3) OF THIS SECTION, the
taxable wage base under paragraph (1) of this subsection shall be the same as under the
federal law.
(c) (1) The Secretary shall determine the rate of contribution for each
employing unit as of the computation date for the next calendar year.
(2) The rate of contribution is effective for 1 calendar year.
(3) (I) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 31 EACH YEAR, THE DEPARTMENT

HOUSE BILL 554 3
SHALL:
1. DETERMINE THE AVERAGE ANNUAL WAGE FOR
EMPLOYEES IN THE STATE DURING THE CALENDAR YEAR OF THE COMPUTATION
DATE; AND
2. MAKE AVAILABLE ON ITS WEBSITE THE AVERAGE
ANNUAL WAGE FOR EMPLOYEES IN THE STATE APPLICABLE TO THE RATE OF
CONTRIBUTION.
(II) 1. THE SECRETARY SHALL ANNUALLY SET THE TAXABLE
WAGE BASE AS AN INCREASING PERCENTAGE OF THE AVERAGE ANNUAL WAGE FOR
EMPLOYEES IN THE STATE UNTIL THE TAXABLE WAGE BASE PROVIDED UNDER
SUBSUBPARAGRAPH 2 OF THIS SUBPARAGRAPH IS IN EFFECT.
2. BEGINNING CALENDAR YEAR 2028 AND EACH
CALENDAR YEAR THEREAFTER, THE TAXABLE WAGE BASE SHALL BE 20% OF THE
AVERAGE ANNUAL WAGE FOR EMPLOYEES IN THE STATE.
(d) (1) By regulation, the Secretary shall set:
(i) THE TAXABLE WAGE BASE;
(II) the date when contributions are due; and
[(ii)] (III) subject to § 8–607.1 of this subtitle, the manner in which
contributions are to be paid.
8–803.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “STATE AVERAGE WEEKLY WAGE” MEANS THE
AVERAGE WEEKLY WAGE IN THE STATE, AS DETERMINED BY THE DEPARTMENT,
BASED ON THE WAGES IN TOTAL COVERED EMPLOYMENT FOR ALL EMPLOYERS IN
THE STATE FOR THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING CALENDAR YEAR.
(B) (1) (I) THE WEEKLY BENEFIT AMOUNT PAYABLE TO A CLAIMANT
UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE AT LEAST 15% OF THE STATE AVERAGE WEEKLY
WAGE BUT NOT MORE THAN THE AMOUNT OF THE STATE AVERAGE WEEKLY WAGE
SET UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH.
(II) 1. THE SECRETARY SHALL ANNUALLY SET THE
MAXIMUM WEEKLY BENEFIT AMOUNT AS AN INCREASING PERCENTAGE OF THE
STATE AVERAGE WEEKLY WAGE UNTIL THE MAXIMUM WEEKLY BENEFIT AMOUNT
PROVIDED UNDER SUBSUBPARAGRAPH 2 OF THIS SUBPARAGRAPH IS IN EFFECT.

HOUSE BILL 554
2. BEGINNING CALENDAR YEAR 2028 AND EACH
CALENDAR YEAR THEREAFTER, THE MAXIMUM WEEKLY BENEFIT SHALL BE
50% OF THE STATE AVERAGE WEEKLY WAGE.
3. THE SECRETARY SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO
CARRY OUT THIS SUBPARAGRAPH.
(2) FOR PURPOSES OF DETERMINING THE MINIMUM AND MAXIMUM
WEEKLY BENEFIT AMOUNTS UNDER THIS SECTION, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL
CALCULATE AND UPDATE THE STATE AVERAGE WEEKLY WAGE ON JULY 1 EACH
YEAR.
(C) (1) FOR PURPOSES OF ASSIGNING A WEEKLY BENEFIT AMOUNT TO A
CLAIMANT, THE CLAIMANT’S WEEKLY BENEFIT AMOUNT SHALL BE COMPUTED BY
DIVIDING THE WAGES THAT THE CLAIMANT WAS PAID FOR COVERED EMPLOYMENT
IN THE CALENDAR QUARTER OF THE CLAIMANT’S BASE PERIOD IN WHICH THOSE
WAGES WERE THE HIGHEST BY 24.
(2) IN COMPUTING BENEFITS UNDER THIS SUBSECTION, A FRACTION
OF A DOLLAR SHALL BE ROUNDED TO THE NEXT HIGHER DOLLAR.
(D) THE WEEKLY BENEFIT AMOUNT CALCULATED UNDER THIS SECTION
THAT IS IN EFFECT ON THE FIRST DAY OF A CLAIMANT’S BENEFIT YEAR APPLIES TO
THE CLAIMANT THROUGHOUT THAT BENEFIT YEAR.
(E) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN § 8–1207 OF THIS TITLE FOR THE WORK
SHARING PROGRAM, AN ELIGIBLE CLAIMANT SHALL BE PAID A WEEKLY BENEFIT
AMOUNT THAT IS COMPUTED BY:
(I) ASSIGNING THE CLAIMANT’S WEEKLY BENEFIT AMOUNT
UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION;
(II) ADDING ANY ALLOWANCE FOR A DEPENDENT TO WHICH THE
CLAIMANT IS ENTITLED UNDER § 8–804 OF THIS SUBTITLE; AND
(III) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
SUBTRACTING ANY WAGES EXCEEDING $50 PAYABLE TO THE CLAIMANT FOR THE
WEEK.
(2) EACH YEAR THE SECRETARY SHALL ADJUST THE AMOUNT OF
WAGES REQUIRED TO BE SUBTRACTED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)(III) OF THIS
SUBSECTION FOR INFLATION.

HOUSE BILL 554 5
(3) IN COMPUTING BENEFITS UNDER THIS SUBSECTION, A FRACTION
OF A DOLLAR SHALL BE ROUNDED TO THE NEXT HIGHER DOLLAR.
(4) A PAYMENT TO AN INDIVIDUAL AS COMPENSATION FOR SERVING
AS AN ELECTION JUDGE FOR A LOCAL BOARD OF ELECTIONS IN THE STATE MAY NOT
BE INCLUDED WHEN COMPUTING THE WAGES REQUIRED TO BE SUBTRACTED UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1)(III) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(F) ANY CHILD SUPPORT PAYMENT THAT IS REQUIRED UNDER § 8–807 OF
THIS SUBTITLE SHALL BE WITHHELD FROM BENEFITS.
8–804.
(a) (1) Subject to subsection (b) of this section, in addition to the weekly benefit
amount [in the schedule of benefits] ASSIGNED IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 8–803 OF THIS
SUBTITLE, a claimant shall be paid an allowance of [$8] $25 for each child, adopted child,
or stepchild of the claimant who, on the 1st day of the benefit year, is:
(i) wholly or partly supported by the claimant; and
(ii) under 16 years of age.
(2) A claimant shall submit to the Secretary the Social Security number or
copy of the birth certificate of each dependent for whom the claimant is to be paid an
allowance.
(b) (1) An allowance under this section is not payable:
(i) for more than 5 dependents of the claimant;
(ii) for longer than the number of weeks of benefits allowable to the
claimant for total unemployment; or
(iii) for any week in which an unemployment benefit is not payable
to the claimant.
(2) Benefits and the allowance under this section in any 1 week may not
exceed the [highest] STATE MAXIMUM weekly benefit amount [in the schedule of benefits],
AS DETERMINED UNDER § 8–803 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(3) EACH YEAR THE SECRETARY SHALL ADJUST THE AMOUNT OF THE
ALLOWANCE REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION FOR INFLATION.
(c) (1) The number of a claimant’s dependents shall be determined as of the

HOUSE BILL 554
1st day of the benefit year and shall be fixed for the duration of the benefit year.
(2) After an individual has been determined to be a dependent of a
claimant, the individual may not be considered to be a dependent of any other claimant
whose benefit year starts within 1 year after the determination.
(d) In the computation of a contribution rate under Part II of Subtitle 6 of this
title, an allowance for a dependent shall be considered a benefit.
(e) Notwithstanding subsection (d) of this section, an allowance for a dependent
may not be deducted from a claimant’s benefit account.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.